Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB612.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 132.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Department" means the Department of Revenue;
(2) "Taxpayer" means any person made liable by law to file a return or pay a tax;
(3) "Real property":
(a) Means all lands within this state and improvements thereon; and
(b) [For property assessed on January 1, 2024, and on January 1, 2025, ]Includes
but is not limited to mains, pipes, pipelines, and conduits that are:
1. Authorized to be installed in, upon, or under any public or private street
or place; and
2. Used or to be used for or in connection with the collection, transmission,
distribution, conducting, sale, or furnishing of heat, steam, water,
sewage, natural or manufactured gas, or electricity to or for the public;
(4) "Personal property" means every species and character of property, tangible and
intangible, other than real property;
(5) "Resident" means any person who has taken up a place of abode within this state
with the intention of continuing to abide in this state; any person who has had his or
her actual or habitual place of abode in this state for the larger portion of the twelve
(12) months next preceding the date as of which an assessment is due to be made
shall be deemed to have intended to become a resident of this state;
(6) "Compensating tax rate" means that rate which, rounded to the next higher one-
tenth of one cent ($0.001) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value and
applied to the current year's assessment of the property subject to taxation by a
taxing district, excluding new property and personal property, produces an amount
of revenue approximately equal to that produced in the preceding year from real
Page 1 of 11
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:30 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1771
property. However, in no event shall the compensating tax rate be a rate which,
when applied to the total current year assessment of all classes of taxable property,
produces an amount of revenue less than was produced in the preceding year from
all classes of taxable property. For purposes of this subsection, "property subject to
taxation" means the total fair cash value of all property subject to full local rates,
less the total valuation exempted from taxation by the homestead exemption
provision of the Constitution and the difference between the fair cash value and
agricultural or horticultural value of agricultural or horticultural land;
(7) "Net assessment growth" means the difference between:
(a) The total valuation of property subject to taxation by the county, city, school
district, or special district in the preceding year, less the total valuation
exempted from taxation by the homestead exemption provision of the
Constitution in the current year over that exempted in the preceding year; and
(b) The total valuation of property subject to taxation by the county, city, school
district, or special district for the current year;
(8) "New property" means the net difference in taxable value between real property
additions and deletions to the property tax roll for the current year. "Real property
additions" shall mean:
(a) Property annexed or incorporated by a municipal corporation, or any other
taxing jurisdiction; however, this definition shall not apply to property
acquired through the merger or consolidation of school districts, or the
transfer of property from one (1) school district to another;
(b) Property, the ownership of which has been transferred from a tax-exempt
entity to a nontax-exempt entity;
(c) The value of improvements to existing nonresidential property;
(d) The value of new residential improvements to property;
(e) The value of improvements to existing residential property when the
Page 2 of 11
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:30 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1771
improvement increases the assessed value of the property by fifty percent
(50%) or more;
(f) Property created by the subdivision of unimproved property, provided, that
when the property is reclassified from farm to subdivision by the property
valuation administrator, the value of the property as a farm shall be a deletion
from that category;
(g) Property exempt from taxation, as an inducement for industrial or business
use, at the expiration of its tax exempt status;
(h) Property, the tax rate of which will change, according to the provisions of
KRS 82.085, to reflect additional urban services to be provided by the taxing
jurisdiction, provided, however, that the property shall be considered "real
property additions" only in proportion to the additional urban services to be
provided to the property over the urban services previously provided; and
(i) The value of improvements to real property previously under assessment
moratorium.
"Real property deletions" shall be limited to the value of real property removed
from, or reduced over the preceding year on, the property tax roll for the current
year;
(9) "Agricultural land" means:
(a) Any tract of land, including all income-producing improvements, of at least
ten (10) contiguous acres in area used for the production of livestock,
livestock products, poultry, poultry products and/or the growing of tobacco
and/or other crops including timber;
(b) Any tract of land, including all income-producing improvements, of at least
five (5) contiguous acres in area commercially used for aquaculture; or
(c) Any tract of land devoted to and meeting the requirements and qualifications
for payments pursuant to agriculture programs under an agreement with the
Page 3 of 11
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:30 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1771
state or federal government;
(10) "Horticultural land" means any tract of land, including all income-producing
improvements, of at least five (5) contiguous acres in area commercially used for
the cultivation of a garden, orchard, or the raising of fruits or nuts, vegetables,
flowers, or ornamental plants;
(11) "Agricultural or horticultural value" means the use value of "agricultural or
horticultural land" based upon income-producing capability and comparable sales
of farmland purchased for farm purposes where the price is indicative of farm use
value, excluding sales representing purchases for farm expansion, better
accessibility, and other factors which inflate the purchase price beyond farm use
value, if any, considering the following factors as they affect a taxable unit:
(a) Relative percentages of tillable land, pasture land, and woodland;
(b) Degree of productivity of the soil;
(c) Risk of flooding;
(d) Improvements to and on the land that relate to the production of income;
(e) Row crop capability including allotted crops other than tobacco;
(f) Accessibility to all-weather roads and markets; and
(g) Factors which affect the general agricultural or horticultural economy, such
as: interest, price of farm products, cost of farm materials and supplies, labor,
or any economic factor which would affect net farm income;
(12) "Deferred tax" means the difference in the tax based on agricultural or horticultural
value and the tax based on fair cash value;
(13) "Homestead" means real property maintained as the permanent residence of the
owner with all land and improvements adjoining and contiguous thereto including
but not limited to lawns, drives, flower or vegetable gardens, outbuildings, and all
other land connected thereto;
(14) "Residential unit" means all or that part of real property occupied as the permanent
Page 4 of 11
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:30 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1771
residence of the owner;
(15) "Special benefits" are those which are provided by public works not financed
through the general tax levy but through special assessments against the benefited
property;
(16) "Manufactured home" means a structure manufactured after June 15, 1976, in
accordance with the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety
Standards Act, transportable in one (1) or more sections, which when erected on
site measures eight (8) body feet or more in width and thirty-two (32) body feet or
more in length, and which is built on a permanent chassis and designed to be used
as a dwelling, with or without a permanent foundation, when connected to the
required utilities, and includes the plumbing, heating, air-conditioning, and
electrical systems contained therein. It may be used as a place of residence,
business, profession, or trade by the owner, lessee, or their assignees and may
consist of one (1) or more units that can be attached or joined together to comprise
an integral unit or condominium structure;
(17) "Mobile home" means a structure manufactured on or before June 15, 1976, that
was not required to be constructed in accordance with the National Manufactured
Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act, transportable in one (1) or more
sections, which when erected on site measures eight (8) body feet or more in width
and thirty-two (32) body feet or more in length, and which is built on a permanent
chassis and designed to be used as a dwelling, with or without a permanent
foundation, when connected to the required utilities, and includes the plumbing,
heating, air-conditioning, and electrical systems contained therein. It may be used
as a place of residence, business, profession, or trade by the owner, lessee, or their
assigns and may consist of one (1) or more units that can be attached or joined
together to comprise an integral unit or condominium structure;
(18) "Modular home" means a structure which is certified by its manufacturer as being
Page 5 of 11
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:30 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1771
constructed in accordance with all applicable provisions of the Kentucky Building
Code and standards adopted by the local authority which has jurisdiction,
transportable in one (1) or more sections, and designed to be used as a dwelling on
a permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities, and includes the
plumbing, heating, air-conditioning, and electrical systems contained therein;
(19) "Prefabricated home" means a manufactured home, a mobile home, or a modular
home;
(20) "Recreational vehicle" means a vehicular type unit primarily designed as temporary
living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use, which either has its own
motive power or is mounted on or drawn by another vehicle. The basic entities are:
travel trailer, camping trailer, truck camper, and motor home. As used in this
subsection:
(a) "Travel trailer" means a vehicular unit, mounted on wheels, designed to
provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use, and
of a size or weight that does not require special highway movement permits
when drawn by a motorized vehicle, and with a living area of less than two
hundred twenty (220) square feet, excluding built-in equipment (such as
wardrobes, closets, cabinets, kitchen units or fixtures) and bath and toilet
rooms;
(b) "Camping trailer" means a vehicular portable unit mounted on wheels and
constructed with collapsible partial side walls which fold for towing by
another vehicle and unfold at the camp site to provide temporary living
quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use;
(c) "Truck camper" means a portable unit constructed to provide temporary living
quarters for recreational, travel, or camping use, consisting of a roof, floor,
and sides, designed to be loaded onto and unloaded from the bed of a pick-up
truck; and
Page 6 of 11
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:30 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1771
(d) "Motor home" means a vehicular unit designed to provide temporary living
quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use built on or permanently
attached to a self-propelled motor vehicle chassis or on a chassis cab or van
which is an integral part of the completed vehicle;
(21) "Hazardous substances" shall have the meaning provided in KRS 224.1-400;
(22) "Pollutant or contaminant" shall have the meaning provided in KRS 224.1-400;
(23) "Release" shall have the meaning as provided in either or both KRS 224.1-400 and
KRS 224.60-115;
(24) "Qualifying voluntary environmental remediation property" means real property
subject to the provisions of KRS 224.1-400 and 224.1-405, or 224.60-135 where the
Energy and Environment Cabinet has made a determination that:
(a) All releases of hazardous substances, pollutants, contaminants, petroleum, or
petroleum products at the property occurred prior to the property owner's
acquisition of the property;
(b) The property owner has made all appropriate inquiry into previous ownership
and uses of the property in accordance with generally accepted practices prior
to the acquisition of the property;
(c) The property owner or a responsible party has provided all legally required
notices with respect to hazardous substances, pollutants, contaminants,
petroleum, or petroleum products found at the property;
(d) The property owner is in compliance with all land use restrictions and does
not impede the effectiveness or integrity of any institutional control;
(e) The property owner complied with any information request or administrative
subpoena under KRS Chapter 224; and
(f) The property owner is not affiliated with any person who is potentially liable
for the release of hazardous substances, pollutants, contaminants, petroleum,
or petroleum products on the property pursuant to KRS 224.1-400, 224.1-405,
Page 7 of 11
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:30 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1771
or 224.60-135, through:
1. Direct or indirect familial relationship;
2. Any contractual, corporate, or financial relationship, excluding
relationships created by instruments conveying or financing title or by
contracts for sale of goods or services; or
3. Reorganization of a business entity that was potentially liable;
(25) "Intangible personal property" means stocks, mutual funds, money market funds,
bonds, loans, notes, mortgages, accounts receivable, land contracts, cash, credits,
patents, trademarks, copyrights, tobacco base, allotments, annuities, deferred
compensation, retirement plans, and any other type of personal property that is not
tangible personal property;
(26) (a) "County" means any county, consolidated local government, urban-county
government, unified local government, or charter county government;
(b) "Fiscal court" means the legislative body of any county, consolidated local
government, urban-county government, unified local government, or charter
county government; and
(c) "County judge/executive" means the chief executive officer of any county,
consolidated local government, urban-county government, unified local
government, or charter county government;
(27) "Taxing district" means any entity with the authority to levy a local ad valorem tax,
including special purpose governmental entities;
(28) "Special purpose governmental entity" shall have the same meaning as in KRS
65A.010, and as used in this chapter shall include only those special purpose
governmental entities with the authority to levy ad valorem taxes, and that are not
specifically exempt from the provisions of this chapter by another provision of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes;
(29) (a) "Broadcast" means the transmission of audio, video, or other signals, through
Page 8 of 11
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:30 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1771
any electronic, radio, light, or similar medium or method now in existence or
later devised over the airwaves to the public in general.
(b) "Broadcast" shall not apply to operations performed by multichannel video
programming service providers as defined in KRS 136.602 or any other
operations that transmit audio, video, or other signals, exclusively to persons
for a fee;
(30) "Livestock" means cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, alpacas, llamas, buffaloes,
and any other animals of the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, equine, or camelid
species;
(31) "Heavy equipment rental agreement" means the short-term rental contract under
which qualified heavy equipment is rented without an operator for a period:
(a) Not to exceed three hundred sixty-five (365) days; or
(b) That is open-ended under the terms of the contract with no specified end date;
(32) "Heavy equipment rental company" means an entity that is primarily engaged in a
line of business described in Code 532412 or 532310 of the North American
Industry Classification System Manual in effect on January 1, 2019;
(33) "Qualified heavy equipment" means machinery and equipment, including ancillary
equipment and any attachments used in conjunction with the machinery and
equipment, that is:
(a) Primarily used and designed for construction, mining, forestry, or industrial
purposes, including but not limited to cranes, earthmoving equipment, well-
drilling machinery and equipment, lifts, material handling equipment, pumps,
generators, and pollution-reducing equipment; and
(b) Held in a heavy equipment rental company's inventory for:
1. Rental under a heavy equipment rental agreement; or
2. Sale in the regular course of business;
(34) "Veteran service organization" means an organization wholly dedicated to
Page 9 of 11
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:30 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1771
advocating on behalf of military veterans and providing charitable programs in
honor and on behalf of military veterans;
(35) "Government restriction on use" means a limitation on the use of at least fifty
percent (50%) of the individual dwelling units of a multi-unit rental housing in
order to receive a federal or state government incentive based on low-income renter
restrictions, including the following government incentives:
(a) A tax credit under Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(b) Financing derived from exempt facility bonds for qualified residential rental
projects under Section 142 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(c) A low-interest loan under Section 235 or 236 of the National Housing Act or
Section 515 of the Housing Act of 1949;
(d) A rent subsidy;
(e) A guaranteed loan;
(f) A grant; or
(g) A guarantee;
(36) "Low income" means earning at or below eighty percent (80%) of the area median
income as defined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development for the location of the multi-unit rental housing; and
(37) "Multi-unit rental housing" means residential property or project consisting of four
(4) or more individual dwelling units and does not include:
(a) Assisted living facilities; or
(b) Duplexes or single-family units unless they are included as part of a larger
property that is subject to government restriction on use.
Section 2. KRS 136.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, except for KRS 136.500 to 136.575, unless the context requires
otherwise:
(1) "Out-of-state business property" means all real and personal property having a
Page 10 of 11
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:30 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1771
taxable situs outside this state owned by a corporation for use in the active conduct
of a trade or business;
(2) "Personal property" means every species and character of property, tangible and
intangible, other than real property;
(3) "Real property":
(a) Means all lands within this state and improvements thereon; and
(b) [For property assessed on January 1, 2024, and on January 1, 2025, ]Includes
but is not limited to mains, pipes, pipelines, and conduits that are:
1. Authorized to be installed in, upon, or under any public or private street
or place; and
2. Used or to be used for or in connection with the collection, transmission,
distribution, conducting, sale, or furnishing of heat, steam, water,
sewage, natural or manufactured gas, or electricity to or for the public;
and
(4) "Tax exempt United States obligations" means all obligations of the United States
exempt from taxation under 31 U.S.C. sec. 3124(a) or exempt under the United
States Constitution or any federal statute including the obligations of any
instrumentality or agency of the United States which are exempt from state or local
taxation under the United States Constitution or any statute of the United States.
Section 3. No claim for refund or credit of a tax overpayment for any taxable
period, made by an amended return, tax refund application, or any other method on or
after the effective date of this Act, and based on the amendments to subsection (3) of
Section 1 of this Act or subsection (3) of Section 2 of this Act, shall be recognized for
any purpose.
Section 4. This Act shall apply retroactively to property assessed on or after
December 31, 2022.
Page 11 of 11
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:30 AM Jacketed